Massachusetts, session 194th, H4095.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of chapter 51 of the General
Laws or any other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any individual aged
16 or 17 years old residing in the town of Conway, who is ineligible to vote due to age under
state law, but who is otherwise eligible to vote under state law, may upon application have their
names entered on a list of voters established by the board of registrars of voters in the town of
Conway. Such individuals on the list of voters may vote in any election for local offices and
local ballot questions in accordance with this Act. For the purposes of this Act, "local voters" are
anyone who is eligible to vote pursuant to this Act in a local election or upon a local ballot
question in the town of Conway.
SECTION 2. Said board of registrars of voters shall establish a separate registration list
for local voters who shall fill out an alternative registration form. Upon turning eighteen, each
of 2

local voter shall be taken off the separate list and notified that he or she must register as a regular
voter in accordance with state law, regulations, and guidelines, in order to be eligible to vote.
Said board shall create and print, at the town of Conway's expense, the special registration form
needed for the purpose of registering local voters.
SECTION 3. Said board is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations, guidelines and
forms to implement the purpose of this act.
SECTION 4. If a local ballot question appears on a state election ballot, the board shall
print a separate ballot for the local ballot question at the expense of the town of Conway.
SECTION 5. The town of Conway is hereby authorized to pass ordinances to implement
the purpose of this act subject to all the provisions of the Conway town charter.
SECTION 6. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to confer upon local voters the right
to vote for any state or federal office or any state or federal ballot questions.
of 2